Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Investigations.

Administrative Code. —

For investigations, see 21 AAC 20.

Sec. 24.55.150.
Appropriate subjects for investigation.

An appropriate subject for investigation by the ombudsman is an administrative act of an agency that the ombudsman has reason to believe might be

contrary to law;

unreasonable, unfair, oppressive, arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion, or unnecessarily discriminatory, even though in accordance with law;

based on a mistake of fact;

based on improper or irrelevant grounds;

unsupported by an adequate statement of reasons;

performed in an inefficient or discourteous manner; or

otherwise erroneous.

The ombudsman may investigate to find an appropriate remedy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.

Sec. 24.55.160.
Investigation procedures; privileged communications.

In an investigation, the ombudsman may

make inquiries and obtain information considered necessary;

enter without notice to inspect the premises of an agency, but only when agency personnel are present;

hold private hearings; and

notwithstanding other provisions of law, have access at all times to records of every agency, including confidential records, except sealed court records, production of which may only be compelled by subpoena, and except for records of active criminal investigations and records that could lead to the identity of confidential police informants.

The ombudsman shall maintain confidentiality with respect to all matters and the identities of the complainants or witnesses coming before the ombudsman except insofar as disclosures may be necessary to enable the ombudsman to carry out duties and to support recommendations. However, the ombudsman may not disclose a confidential record obtained from an agency.

Disclosure by an agency to the ombudsman under this chapter of a communication that is subject to the attorney-client privilege, or attorney work-product privilege, does not waive the privilege as to any other person. The ombudsman may not disclose a privileged communication provided under this subsection unless the communication is evidence of an act of an agency that the ombudsman reasonably believes is criminal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 71 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 38 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (c) of this section on Rules 501 and 503, Alaska Rules of Evidence, see sec. 7(a), ch. 38, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For records, see 21 AAC 10, art. 3.

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.

For confidential information, see 21 AAC 20, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (a)(4), deleted “state” following “records of every”; added (c).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Insofar as the ombudsman has a legitimate governmental interest in access and he is not the “public,” the ombudsman may be allowed access to personnel files, but only upon his assurance that the contents of the files will not, under any circumstances except an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, become public in whole or in part. February 28, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 24.55.170.
Powers.

Subject to the privileges that witnesses have in the courts of this state, the ombudsman may compel by subpoena, at a specified time and place, the

appearance and sworn testimony of a person who the ombudsman reasonably believes may be able to give information relating to a matter under investigation; and

production by a person of a record or object that the ombudsman reasonably believes may relate to the matter under investigation.

If a person refuses to comply with a subpoena issued under (a) of this section, the superior court may, on application of the ombudsman, compel obedience by proceedings for contempt in the same manner as in the case of disobedience to the requirements of a subpoena issued by the court or refusal to testify in the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Insofar as the ombudsman has a legitimate governmental interest in access and he is not the “public,” an ombudsman may be allowed access to personnel files, but only upon his assurance that the contents of the files will not, under any circumstances except an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, become public in whole or in part. February 28, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.